src/pron-deu-lex.txt
LEXICON Pronoun 
Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
Reflexive ;

LEXICON Personal
erer+Pron+Pers+Msc+Sg+Nom:er # ;
er+Pron+Pers+Msc+Sg+Acc:ihn # ;
er+Pron+Pers+Msc+Sg+Gen:ihnen # ;
er+Pron+Pers+Msc+Sg+Dat:ihm # ;
sie+Pron+Pers+Fem+Sg+Nom:sie # ;
sie+Pron+Pers+Fem+Sg+Acc:sie # ;
sie+Pron+Pers+Fem+Sg+Gen:ihnen # ;
sie+Pron+Pers+Fem+Sg+Dat:ihnen # ;

LEXICON Demonstrative
der+Pron+Dem+Msc+Sg+Nom:der # ;
der+Pron+Dem+Msc+Sg+Acc:den # ;
der+Pron+Dem+Msc+Sg+Gen:des # ;
der+Pron+Dem+Msc+Sg+Dat:dem # ;

LEXICON Reflexive
# ;
